Massachusetts, session 194th, H1759.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in, in lines 3 and 4, the words "or in the
commission or attempted commission of a crime punishable with death or imprisonment for
life,".
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said section 265, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the second sentence the following sentence:- Where a killing occurs
during the commission or attempted commission of a crime punishable with imprisonment for
life, the killing shall amount to murder for a principal perpetrator who is personally and directly
responsible for committing the killing and acts with the same malice forethought towards the
of 3

killing as is required for a killing to amount to murder when not done in the course or furtherance
of another offense.
SECTION 3. Chapter 274 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out section 2 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 2. Whoever aids in the commission of a felony, or is accessory thereto
before the fact by counselling, hiring or otherwise procuring such felony to be committed, shall
be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of the principal felon; provided,
however, that in the event of a killing resulting during the commission or attempted commission
of a felony, the killing shall amount to murder in the first degree only for a principal perpetrator
who is personally and directly responsible for committing the killing and acts with the same
malice forethought towards the killing as is required for a killing to amount to murder when not
done in the course or furtherance of another offense.
Whoever aids in the commission of a killing or is accessory thereto before the fact
by counseling, hiring, or otherwise procuring such killing to be committed but is not a principal
perpetrator who is personally and directly responsible for committing the killing, shall be
punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a period of not less than 2 and 1/2 years nor
more than 25 years.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, sections 1 and 2 shall apply to
any person charged or convicted with murder prior to, on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, section 3 shall apply to any
person charged or convicted with aiding in the commission of a killing or who is accessory
of 3

thereto before the fact by counseling, hiring, or otherwise procuring such killing to be committed
prior to, on or after the effective date of this act.
of 3